Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,164.03
Agricultural Products Marketing Information Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Director of Agriculture is hereby authorized to receive voluntary gifts and contributions from the federal government, private agencies, farm industry associations, individuals, and any other person, or to collect fees or charges for services or publications from any source, including, but not limited to, the federal government, state governments, public agencies, and private entities or individuals for the purpose of defraying the expenses of carrying out subdivision (1)(c) of section 81-201 and sections 81-2,163 and 81-2,164.03. All advances so received shall be credited to the Agricultural Products Marketing Information Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. Disbursements from such fund shall be made upon vouchers approved by the director and warrants issued thereon as provided by law. All money received from the federal government, local government agencies, private research agencies, farm industry associations, individuals, or any other person, which are reimbursements for expenditures made, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Agricultural Products Marketing Information Cash Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1953, c. 337, § 3, p. 1110;

Laws 1955, c. 335, § 1, p. 1047;

Laws 1965, c. 8, § 48, p. 117;

Laws 1974, LB 888, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 795, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 100;

Laws 2018, LB135, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB794, § 5.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.